Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Chapter 57. Comprehensive Plan for Provision of Services to Disabled Persons
[Repealed]

§§ 43-57-1 through 43-57-11.
Repealed.

Repealed by operation of law of §43-57-11, Laws, 2001, ch. 469, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2003.

§43-57-1. [Laws, 2001, ch. 469, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2001.)]

§43-57-3. [Laws, 2001, ch. 469, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2001.)]

§43-57-5. [Laws, 2001, ch. 469, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2001.)]

§43-57-7. [Laws, 2001, ch. 469, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2001.)]

§43-57-9. [Laws, 2001, ch. 469, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2001.)]

§43-57-11. [Laws, 2001, ch. 469, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2001.)]